Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-271
Inspectors of election.

(MBCA 7.29) (a) A public
corporation shall, and any other corporation may, appoint one or more inspectors
to act at a meeting of shareholders and make a written report of the inspectors'
determinations. Each inspector shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute
the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best
of the inspector's ability.

(b) The inspectors shall:

(1) Ascertain the number
of shares outstanding and the voting power of each;

(2) Determine the shares represented
at a meeting;

(3)
Determine the validity of proxies and ballots;

(4) Count all votes; and

(5) Determine the result.

(c) An inspector may be
an officer or employee of the corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 71.
January 1, 2017